District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
28 be cited as the “Strengthening Air Pollution Permitting Amendment Act of 2026”.
29 Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Air Pollution Control Act of 1984, effective March 15,
30 1985 (D.C. Law 5-165; D.C. Official Code § 8-101.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
31 (a)Section 5 (D.C. Official Code § 8-101.05) is amended as follows:
32 (1)subsection (b)(1)(F) is amended by striking the phrase “and property” and
33 inserting in its place the phrase “, property, and public spaces”.
34 (2)subsection (b)(2) is amended to read as follows:
35 “(2) In determining interference with reasonable enjoyment of life, property, and

36 public spaces under paragraph (1)(F) of this subsection, the Mayor shall consider:
37 “(A) The frequency, duration, and intensity of the source and associated
38 facility operations, including emissions produced by vehicles and other non-stationary equipment
39 operating within the facility or entering and exiting the facility;
40 “(B) The proximity of a source to residences, schools, parks, recreation
41 centers, playgrounds, and trails;
42 “(C) Health disparities in the District, particularly with respect to
43 conditions associated with exposure to air pollution;
44 “(D) The source’s ability to prevent complaints;
45 “(E) The operating hours and days of the source and the extent to which
46 they conflict with reasonable enjoyment of life, property, and public spaces; and
47 “(F) The cumulative impact experienced by affected community created
48 by the source in concert with other sources as well as associated nuisances including noise and
49 light pollution.”
50 (3) subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
51 “(d) To assist in enforcing the provisions of this part and regulations issued pursuant to
52 this part, the Mayor shall:
53 “(1) Make available an electronic complaint form to receive complaints of air
54 quality violations from the public, including, at a minimum, complaints of odors and engine
55 idling and complaints of violation of permit terms and conditions;
56 “(2) Acknowledge receipt of an air quality complaint to the complainant no later
57 than 7 days after receipt, in a writing or through an electronic message;
2

58 “(3) Respond to an air quality complaint with a finding within sixty days of its
59 submission;
60 “(4) Track all air quality complaints, the agency’s response to each complaint, and
61 the resolution of each complaint;
62 “(5) Establish an electronic mechanism by which the complainant, the source of
63 the complaint, and any interested party may access information about the status and resolution of
64 an air quality complaint;
65 “(6) Make publicly available on DOEE’s website a quarterly report listing all air
66 quality complaints received, the date of the complaint, the status of the complaint, DOEE’s
67 finding, the date of DOEE’s finding, and the date of any appeal;
68 “(7) Establish requirements for permit applicants to notify via email and signed
69 placards impacted advisory neighborhood commissions, civic associations, and other community
70 organizations serving communities of any permit application;
71 “(8) Establish requirements for permit applicants to provide written notice to
72 property owners within 500 feet of any property associated with operations subject to the permit;
73 and
74 “(9) Establish and maintain a publish dashboard listing all air quality permit
75 applications, their status, links to word-searchable versions of air quality permits, the number of
76 air quality complaints received regarding each permitted facility, and the number of air quality
77 complaints sustained regarding each permitted facility.”
78 (b) Section 5c (D.C. Official Code § 8–101.05c) is amended by inserting a new
79 subsection (c) to read as follows:
80 “(c) A person or affiliated business entity that commits two violations of this part or a
3

81 regulation promulgated pursuant to this part in any twelve-month period shall be ineligible to
82 receive a contract with the District for a period of six months after the second violation.”
83 (c) Section 5f (D.C. Official Code § 8–101.05f) is amended by inserting new paragraphs
84 (3) and (4) to read as follows:
85 “(3) A civil action may be brought by a resident or corporation of the District of
86 Columbia in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or any other court of competent
87 jurisdiction for damages, cost recovery, reasonable attorney and expert witness fees, and
88 injunctive or other appropriate relief to enforce compliance with this part or the regulations
89 adopted pursuant to this part. Such civil action shall be subject to review by the District of
90 Columbia Court of Appeals under section 11 of the District of Columbia Administrative
91 Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1203; D.C. Official Code § 2–510).
92 “(4) The People’s Counsel may represent and appeal for the people of the District of
93 Columbia and any individual or individuals suffering a legal wrong, or adversely affected or
94 aggrieved by an order or decision of the Mayor or an agency regarding an action subject to an
95 action subject to this part or regulations adopted pursuant to this part, and such civil action shall
96 be subject to review by the District of Columbia Court of Appeals under section 11 of the
97 District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1203;
98 D.C. Official Code § 2–510).”
99 (d) Section 5h(b) (D.C. Official Code § 8–101.05h(b)) is amended by:
100 (1) striking the number “15” and inserting the number “30” in its place; and
101 (2) striking the number “20 and inserting the number “45” in its place.
102 (e) Section 5i(c) (D.C. Official Code § 8-101.05i.) is amended by inserting the phrase
103 “with priority given to environmental remediation, enhanced monitoring, or air quality
4

104 improvement in District communities that experience disproportionate exposure to lower air
105 quality” after the word “Environment”.
106 (f) New Sections 5j, 5k, and 5l are added to read as follows:
107 “§ 8–101.05j. Local air quality permit authority
108 “(a) When issuing an operating permit for a major or minor source, the Mayor shall
109 include in the permit:
110 “(1) Limits for the total particulate matter, carbon monoxide, sulfur dioxide,
111 nitrogen oxides, and volatile organic compounds generated in the operation of the facility where
112 the source is located. These limits shall account for emissions from vehicles or equipment that
113 will be operating within the facility or entering and exiting the facility;
114 “(2) A requirement that the permit holder maintain a public website where contact
115 information for an employee who serves as a community liaison for the sources is listed and a
116 requirement that this information be updated if the employee is unavailable or is replaced;
117 “(3) Requirements regarding community engagement, including provisions
118 requiring the permit holder to:
119 “(A) Attend at least one and up to four meetings, annually, of the advisory
120 neighborhood commission, civic association, or other community organization in the
121 neighborhood where permitted source is located per year of operation of the permit;
122 “(B) Fulfil an emailed or written request to attend an advisory
123 neighborhood commission, civic association, or other community meeting within 90 days of
124 receiving a request; and
125 “(C) Notify via email all of the advisory neighborhood commissioners
126 serving on the advisory neighborhood commission in which they are located within 30 days of
5

127 any material breach of permit conditions or application for a revised or superseding permit.
128 “(4) Permitted hours of operations to prevent interference of reasonable
129 enjoyment of life, property, and public spaces, including trails, parks, schools, child development
130 centers, and playgrounds;
131 “(5) The amount by which operations shall be reduced at times when the air
132 quality index for the District of Columbia is Orange;
133 “(6) The amount by which operations shall be reduced or cease altogether when
134 the air quality index for the District of Columbia is Red, Purple or Maroon;
135 “(7) Provisions for the disclosure of data from on-site air quality or permit
136 compliance monitoring;
137 “(8) Annual training of on-site managers and employees about the terms and
138 conditions of permit and associated quality control responsibilities.
139 “(b) When requested in a resolution adopted by an advisory neighborhood commission
140 within 300 feet of the source, the Mayor shall also include in the permit a requirement that the
141 permit holder enter into a community agreement with the advisory neighborhood commission
142 where the source is located regarding mitigation of impacts on the community, operations and
143 impacts, including parking, hours, noise levels, and complaint management and resolution.”
144 “§ 8–101.05k. Timely Review of Air Quality Permits
145 “(a) The Mayor shall establish deadlines for the timely review of air quality permits and
146 odor control plans, providing that review of a permit for a major or minor source or an odor
147 control plan shall be completed within six months of submission. These deadlines shall apply to
148 all permits and odor control plans, including renewals and modifications of existing permits and
149 plans.
6

150 “(b) The Mayor shall set fines, permit fees, and other fees for permits issued under this
151 Part at a level sufficient to ensure timely review of permit applications—including staff of
152 contract costs required to review permits by the standard deadline—and timely enforcement of
153 air quality and odor control complaints.
154 “(c) The Mayor shall establish deadlines for the filing of permit renewal or modification
155 applications that ensure DOEE has sufficient time to complete the timely review of a permit
156 application prior to the expiration of the existing permit.
157 “(d) The Mayor shall prohibit the following sources from operating after the expiration of
158 any air permit or odor control permit:
159 “(1) A major source;
160 “(2) A minor source;
161 “(3) A facility used for the cultivation or processing of marijuana;
162 “(4) Painting operations subject to the requirements of 20 DCMR §§ 718 and
163 1409;
164 “(5) A trash transfer station;
165 “(6) A concrete processing, recycling, or production facility;
166 “(7) An asphalt processing, recycling, or production facility; and
167 “(8) A wastewater treatment facility or system.”
168 “§ 8–101.05l. Model Language for District Contracts
169 “The Department of Energy and the Environment shall draft and make available to the
170 Office of Contracting and Procurement and District agencies with independent procurement
171 authority contract terms that require contractor adherence to District air permitting laws and that
172 explicitly provide for cancellation of a District contract for material violations of permit terms
7

173 and conditions.”
174 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
175 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
176 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
177 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
178 Sec. 4. Effective date.
179 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
180 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
181 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
182 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
183 Columbia Register.
8